Utah statutes.
76-4-301.   Specific attempt or conspiracy offense prevails.
Whenever any offense specifically designates or defines an attempt or
conspiracy and provides a penalty for the attempt or conspiracy other than
provided in this chapter, the specific offense shall prevail over the
provisions of this chapter.
